Hawaii statutes.
§371-4 Labor and industrial
relations appeals board. (a) There is created a labor and industrial
relations appeals board composed of three members nominated and, by and with
the advice and consent of the senate, appointed by the governor for terms of ten
years each, except that the terms of members first appointed shall be for six,
eight, and ten years respectively as designated by the governor at the time of
appointments. The governor shall designate the chairperson of the board, who
shall be an attorney at law licensed to practice in all of the courts of this
State. Each member shall hold office until the member's successor is appointed
and qualified. Because cumulative experience and continuity in office are
essential to the proper handling of appeals under workers' compensation law and
other labor laws, it is hereby declared to be in the public interest to
continue board members in office as long as efficiency is demonstrated. The
members shall devote full time to their duties as members of the board.
Effective July 1, 2005, the chairperson of the board shall be paid a salary set
at eighty-seven per cent of the salary of the director of labor and industrial
relations, and the salary of each of the other members shall be ninety-five per
cent of the chairperson's salary.

(b) The board shall have power to decide
appeals from decisions and orders of the director of labor and industrial
relations issued under the workers' compensation law and any other law for
which an appeal to the board is provided by law.

(c) For purposes of appeals to the board
conducted pursuant to chapter 91, notwithstanding section 91-9.5, all parties
shall be given written notice of hearing by first class mail at least fifteen
days before the hearing.

(d) Unless otherwise provided by law, if
service by first class mail is not made because the board or its agents have
been unable to ascertain the address of the party after reasonable and diligent
inquiry, the notice of hearing may be given to the party by online posting on the
board's webpage or by publication at least once in each of two successive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation. The online posting or last published
notice shall appear at least fifteen days prior to the date of the hearing.
The online posting shall be removed from the webpage no less than five business
days after the date of the hearing.

(e) A decision concurred in by any two members
shall constitute a decision of the board.

(f) A vacancy in the board, if there remain
two members of it, shall not impair the authority of two members to act.

(g) If any member of the board is unable to
act because of absence, temporary disability, or disqualification, the governor
may make a temporary appointment and the appointee shall have all the powers
and duties of a regular member of the board.

(h) The chairperson of the appeal board shall
be responsible for the administrative functions of the appeal board. The
appeal board may:

(1) Appoint an executive officer and hearings
officer, and employ other employees as it deems necessary in the performance of
its functions;

(2) Set the duties and compensation of the executive
officer, hearings officer, and employees; and

(3) Provide for the reimbursement of actual and
necessary expenses incurred by the executive officer, hearings officer, and
employees in the performance of their duties, within the amounts made available
by appropriations therefor.

Members of the appeal board and employees other
than clerical and stenographic employees shall be exempt from chapters 76 and
89. Clerical and stenographic employees shall be employed in accordance with
chapter 76.

(i) The board shall be within the department
of labor and industrial relations for budgetary and administrative purposes
only.

(j) The board may adopt rules within its area
of responsibilities in accordance with chapter 91.

(k) The board may make or issue any order or
take other appropriate steps as may be necessary to enforce its rules and
orders and to carry into full effect the powers and duties given to it by law.
The board may after notice and reasonable opportunity to be heard by the board:

(1) Impose administrative sanctions; and

(2) Impose monetary sanctions of not more than $250
for each offense against any person who is found to have violated the board's
rules or orders, which amounts shall be deposited into the special compensation
fund created by section 386-151.

The board shall determine and direct the
appropriate notice and form for such opportunity to be heard. [L 1939, c 237,
pt of §1(7); RL 1945, §4109; RL 1955, §88-10; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §5; HRS
§371-4; am L 1969, c 244, §1a; am L 1975, c 5, §1, c 41, §1, and c 58, §18; am
L 1982, c 129, §15; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 128, §14; am L 1989, c 329, §12;
am L 1990, c 140, §7; gen ch 1993; am L 1994, c 92, §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150;
am L 2002, c 148, §41; am L 2005, c 226, §12; am L 2009, c 3, §2; am L 2012, c
261, §1; am L 2013, c 14, §1; am L 2015, c 4, §1]

Cross References

Boards, generally, see §26-34.

Attorney General Opinions

Member holding over will be a de jure, not merely a de facto,
officer. Att. Gen. Op. 73-7.

Neither the disability compensation division (DCD) nor the
labor and industrial relations appeals board (LIRAB) is an "entity"
for purposes of chapter 323C when it reviews, evaluates, and decides on claims
for workers' compensation; some provisions of chapter 323C apply to each in its
adjudicatory capacity because the DCD and the LIRAB receive protected health
information when they process workers' compensation claims. Att. Gen. Op.
2000-2.

Subsection (a) is constitutional, with regard to the use of
the phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Case Notes

Board is an agency within meaning of §91-1. 54 H. 479, 510
P.2d 89 (1973).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next